Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,268
Commission; director; qualifications; employ.

The commission shall employ a director. He shall be qualified by education and experience to assume the responsibilities of such office.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 7.